Wisconsin, session 2025, AB143.
do enact as follows:AB143,11Section 1. 343.45 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB143,2,42343.45 (2m) Subsections (1) and (2) apply irrespective of whether the person 3authorizing or permitting the operation of a motor vehicle had actual knowledge of 4the vehicle operator’s authorization under this chapter to operate a motor vehicle.AB143,25Section 2. 343.45 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB143,2,96343.45 (3) Except as another penalty is provided by s. 343.245 (4) (b), any 7person violating this section may be required to forfeit not more than $100 is subject 8to a fine not to exceed $1,000 for a first offense and not to exceed $10,000 for a 2nd 9or subsequent offense.AB143,310Section 3. 343.46 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB143,2,1311343.46 (2m) Subsection (1) applies irrespective of whether the person renting 12a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer to another had actual knowledge of the 13vehicle operator’s authorization under this chapter to operate a motor vehicle.AB143,414Section 4. 343.46 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB143,2,1715343.46 (4) Any person violating this section may be required to forfeit not 16more than $100 is subject to a fine not to exceed $1,000 for a first offense and not to 17exceed $10,000 for a 2nd or subsequent offense.AB143,518Section 5. Initial applicability.AB143,2,2019(1) This act first applies to a violation committed on the effective date of this 20subsection.AB143,2,2121